dev/dout.nouns.shemp.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="פני/יה__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>יה</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ית</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתי</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתנו</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתך</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתך</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתכם</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתכן</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתן</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתו</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתה</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יתם</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיי</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותינו</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיך</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותייך</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכם</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכן</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהן</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיו</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיה</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהם</l><r>יה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="הזדכו/ת__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ת</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ת</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תי</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תנו</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תך</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תך</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תכם</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תכן</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תן</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תו</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תה</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תם</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יות</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יות</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיי</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותינו</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיך</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותייך</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיכם</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיכן</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיהן</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיו</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיה</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יותיהם</l><r>ת<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ריצ/ה__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ת</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תי</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תנו</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תך</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תך</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תכם</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תכן</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תן</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תו</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תה</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>תם</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיי</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותינו</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיך</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותייך</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכם</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכן</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהן</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיו</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיה</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהם</l><r>ה<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="הפרטה"><i>הפרט</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התכתבות"><i>התכתבו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הגעלה"><i>הגעל</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="אפייה"><i>אפי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היבלעות"><i>היבלעו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="העבה"><i>העב</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התנדנדות"><i>התנדנדו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="פצייה"><i>פצי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היזכרות"><i>היזכרו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="השקעה"><i>השקע</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התאהבות"><i>התאהבו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="כמישה"><i>כמיש</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הסתמרות"><i>הסתמרו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ירייה"><i>ירי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הדממה"><i>הדממ</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="חציבה"><i>חציב</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="רווייה"><i>רווי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היפגמות"><i>היפגמו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="נפילה"><i>נפיל</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="פלייה"><i>פלי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היחטפות"><i>היחטפו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="תהייה"><i>תהי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="חניקה"><i>חניק</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="זרייה"><i>זרי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היכנעות"><i>היכנעו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="העדה"><i>העד</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הסתמררות"><i>הסתמררו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="קציצה"><i>קציצ</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="פדייה"><i>פדי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="שבירה"><i>שביר</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היאחזות"><i>היאחזו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="שבייה"><i>שבי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="פשייה"><i>פשי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="בלייה"><i>בלי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="צפירה"><i>צפיר</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התגברות"><i>התגברו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="יציקה"><i>יציק</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="כפייה"><i>כפי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התבסמות"><i>התבסמו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="גזירה"><i>גזיר</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="בכייה"><i>בכי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הזדככות"><i>הזדככו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="העללה"><i>העלל</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="קהייה"><i>קהי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הקמה"><i>הקמ</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התעדנות"><i>התעדנו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הסתגלות"><i>הסתגלו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הקדמה"><i>הקדמ</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="דהייה"><i>דהי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="כלייה"><i>כלי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="החכמה"><i>החכמ</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הסתממות"><i>הסתממו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="צפייה"><i>צפי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="געייה"><i>געי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היתחבות"><i>היתחבו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="קשירה"><i>קשיר</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התפקעות"><i>התפקעו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="חזירה"><i>חזיר</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ראייה"><i>ראי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="חתימה"><i>חתימ</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היסמכות"><i>היסמכו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="טווייה"><i>טווי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="טריפה"><i>טריפ</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התמצאות"><i>התמצאו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="נהייה"><i>נהי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="רינה"><i>רינ</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="שהייה"><i>שהי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="שפיכה"><i>שפיכ</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="היוורשות"><i>היוורשו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="תלייה"><i>תלי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="עטייה"><i>עטי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הרצנה"><i>הרצנ</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הישתלות"><i>הישתלו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="חצייה"><i>חצי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הישזרות"><i>הישזרו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="טעייה"><i>טעי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="אריזה"><i>אריז</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התנגדות"><i>התנגדו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="לקייה"><i>לקי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="חנייה"><i>חני</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הבחנה"><i>הבחנ</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התחלות"><i>התחלו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="שרייה"><i>שרי</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התבשמות"><i>התבשמו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="מנייה"><i>מני</i><par n="פני/יה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התרגשות"><i>התרגשו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="הערצה"><i>הערצ</i><par n="ריצ/ה__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="התרוקנות"><i>התרוקנו</i><par n="הזדכו/ת__n_f"/></e>
